Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVI.] SUPERSEDING CHAPTERS

§414D-311 Superseding chapters. In the
event of any conflict between the provisions of this chapter and the provisions
of chapter 421J, 514A, 514B, or 514E, the provisions of chapter 421J, 514A,
514B, or 514E shall supersede and control the provisions of this chapter. [L
2002, c 130, §3; am L 2004, c 164, §11; am L 2005, c 93, §7; am L 2008, c 28,
§8]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next